Illinois, session 104th, SB3723.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Internet Gaming Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. Unless otherwise provided in this 7Act, the terms used in this Act have the same meaning given to 8those terms in the Illinois Gambling Act. Further, as used in 9this Act:10    "Adjusted gross gaming revenue" means the total of all 11sums actually received by an Internet gaming licensee from 12Internet gaming operations, excluding voided wagers, free 13play, and promotional credits, less the total of all sums 14actually paid out as winnings to patrons, which includes the 15cash equivalent of any merchandise or thing of value awarded 16as a prize, and the total of successfully disputed credit or 17debit card charges that were previously included in the 18computation of gross gaming revenue. "Adjusted gross gaming 19revenue" does not include the dollar amount of non-cashable 20vouchers, coupons, or promotions redeemed by participants on 21an Internet gaming platform.22    "Board" means the Illinois Gaming Board.23    "Internet game" means an Internet-based version or   SB3723- 2 -LRB104 19758 LNS 33208 b1substantial equivalent of a gambling game, slot machine, 2poker, table game, or any other game approved by the Board, 3including, but not limited to, simulcasted live-dealer 4versions of casino games in which an individual wagers money 5or something of monetary value for the opportunity to win 6money or something of monetary value, and which is accessed by 7an Internet-connected computer or mobile device. "Internet 8game" includes gaming tournaments conducted via the Internet 9in which players compete against one another or in one or more 10of the games authorized in this Act. "Internet game" does not 11include sports wagering conducted pursuant to the Sports 12Wagering Act or fantasy contests in which one or more players 13compete against each other and winning outcomes reflect the 14relative knowledge and skill of the players and are determined 15predominantly by accumulated statistical results of the 16performance of individuals, including athletes in the case of 17sporting events.18    "Internet gaming" means conducting Internet games.19    "Internet gaming licensee" means the owners licensee or 20organization licensee that holds an Internet gaming license 21under this Act.22    "Internet gaming operator" means an Internet gaming 23licensee that operates an Internet gaming platform or, if an 24Internet management service provider operates the Internet 25gaming platform, the Internet management service provider.26    "Internet gaming platform" means the combination of   SB3723- 3 -LRB104 19758 LNS 33208 b1hardware and software or other technology designed and used to 2manage, conduct, and record Internet gaming and the wagers 3associated with Internet gaming.4    "Internet gaming skin" means a distinctly branded Internet 5gaming platform operated by an Internet gaming operator, which 6may encompass a website, mobile application, or other portal 7to the Internet gaming platform. The brand may be that of the 8Internet gaming licensee or its affiliate, the Internet 9management service provider, or another brand as agreed upon 10by the Internet gaming licensee and its Internet management 11service provider.12    "Internet management service provider" means a licensed 13business entity that operates an Internet gaming platform 14pursuant to an agreement with an Internet gaming licensee. 15    "Internet wagering" means the placing of wagers with an 16Internet gaming operator by persons who are either physically 17present in the State or in another permissible jurisdiction 18with which the Board has entered into a reciprocal agreement 19when placing a wager or otherwise permitted to place a wager by 20law.21    "Internet wagering account" means a financial record 22established and accessible through an Internet gaming platform 23for an individual patron in which the patron may deposit and 24withdraw funds for Internet gaming and other authorized 25purchases and to which the Internet gaming operator may credit 26winnings or other amounts due to that patron or authorized by   SB3723- 4 -LRB104 19758 LNS 33208 b1that patron. Nothing in this Act shall prohibit the use of the 2same Internet wagering account for sports wagering conducted 3and authorized under the Sports Wagering Act.4    "Organization licensee" has the meaning given to that term 5in the Illinois Horse Racing Act of 1975.6    "Owners licensee" means the holder of an owners license 7issued under the Illinois Gambling Act.8    "Permissible jurisdiction" means another jurisdiction from 9which wagers may be accepted pursuant to Section 60.10    "Supplier" means (i) a seller or lessor of gaming 11equipment, systems, or other items to conduct Internet gaming, 12including a manufacturer, distributor, wholesaler, or 13retailer; (ii) a provider of Internet gaming equipment, 14maintenance, or repair services; (iii) a provider of security 15services at designated gaming areas; or (iv) any other 16purveyor of goods, data, or services to an Internet gaming 17licensee or Internet management service provider licensee, as 18deemed necessary by the Board if the Board determines that the 19goods, data, or services impact the integrity or security of 20the Internet gaming operation.  21    Section 10. Board powers and responsibilities. The Board 22has the same powers and responsibilities with respect to the 23offering of Internet gaming as it has with respect to 24non-Internet gaming pursuant to Section 5 of the Illinois 25Gambling Act, except where the exercise of such powers or   SB3723- 5 -LRB104 19758 LNS 33208 b1responsibilities is incompatible with the offering of gambling 2games over the Internet or with this Act. 3    Section 15. Rulemaking.4    (a) The Board shall adopt emergency rules within 90 days 5after the effective date of this Act to administer this Act in 6accordance with Section 5-45 of the Illinois Administrative 7Procedure Act. For the purposes of the Illinois Administrative 8Procedure Act, the General Assembly finds that the adoption of 9rules to implement this Act is deemed an emergency and 10necessary to the public interest, safety, and welfare.11    (b) In adopting rules and regulating the conduct of 12Internet gaming, the Board shall to the greatest extent 13possible utilize existing rules adopted under the Illinois 14Gambling Act and amend existing rules or adopt new rules or 15standards only as reasonably necessary to implement Internet 16gaming under this Act. The Board shall look to the Internet 17gaming rules of other regulated jurisdictions in the United 18States and shall implement consistent rules to the greatest 19extent practicable. 20    Section 20. Internet gaming authorized.21    (a) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, 22Internet gaming is only lawful when conducted by an Internet 23gaming operator in accordance with the provisions of this Act 24and the rules of the Board.  SB3723- 6 -LRB104 19758 LNS 33208 b1    (b) Internet gaming shall only be offered by an Internet 2gaming licensee or an Internet management service provider 3that has contracted with an Internet gaming licensee. An 4Internet gaming licensee shall offer no more than 3 5individually branded Internet gaming skins. The Internet 6gaming licensee may operate the platform and contract with up 7to 3 Internet management service providers to conduct Internet 8gaming in accordance with the rules of the Board and the 9provisions of this Act. An Internet management service 10provider may conduct Internet gaming on its own Internet 11gaming platform pursuant to the agreement between the provider 12and an Internet gaming licensee and in accordance with the 13rules of the Board and the provisions of this Act.14    (c) The primary servers necessary to the placement or 15resolution of wagers on an Internet gaming platform shall be 16located within a facility that is secure and inaccessible to 17the public. The primary servers may be located anywhere in the 18United States that is in compliance with federal law for a 19period of one year following the effective date of this Act. 20Beginning one year after the effective date of this Act, the 21primary servers must be located in the State. All wagers 22placed by a person physically located in the State are deemed 23to be placed in this State. The intermediate routing of 24electronic data in connection with Internet gaming, including 25across State lines, shall not determine the location or 26locations in which a wager is initiated, received, or   SB3723- 7 -LRB104 19758 LNS 33208 b1otherwise made. 2    Section 25. Requirements of Internet gaming platform.3    (a) An Internet gaming operator may accept wagers on an 4Internet gaming platform only as follows: 5        (1) the wager is placed directly with the Internet 6    gaming operator through an Internet wagering account; and 7        (2) the Internet gaming operator has verified that the 8    person placing the wager is the holder of the Internet 9    wagering account and is physically located within this 10    State or a permissible jurisdiction using technological 11    requirements in compliance with this Section.12    (b) An Internet gaming platform shall include age and 13location verification mechanisms and requirements that are 14designed to preclude knowingly accepting wagers from 15individuals under 21 years of age, persons not physically 16within the State or a permissible jurisdiction, and persons 17otherwise excluded from Internet gaming from establishing 18Internet wagering accounts or from engaging in Internet gaming 19under this Act. The Internet gaming platform's age, location, 20and eligibility detection mechanisms shall monitor attempts to 21access the system and shall use commercially reasonable 22attempts to block unauthorized attempts to access the system.23    (c) An Internet gaming operator shall implement 24commercially reasonable data security standards to prevent 25unauthorized access by any person whose identity has not been   SB3723- 8 -LRB104 19758 LNS 33208 b1verified or cannot be verified, in accordance with rules 2adopted by the Board. The Internet gaming platform's identity 3verification mechanisms shall monitor attempts to access the 4system and shall use commercially reasonable attempts to block 5unauthorized attempts to access the system by persons who are 6not the wagering account holder.7    (d) An Internet gaming operator shall implement 8commercially reasonable standards to protect the privacy and 9security of patrons to a reasonable degree of certainty. 10Internet gaming operators shall establish and offer patrons 11the option to protect their accounts with multi-factor 12authentication or authentication features such as personal 13identification numbers or biometric data.14    (e) An Internet gaming operator shall establish internal 15and accounting controls applicable to Internet gaming and 16shall ensure that the security and integrity of all financial 17transactions in connection with Internet gaming shall comply 18with this Act and any rules adopted by the Board.19    (f) Each Internet gaming operator shall collect, report, 20and pay all applicable taxes and fees and shall maintain all 21books, records, and documents pertaining to the Internet 22gaming operators gaming operations in a manner approved by the 23Board.24    (g) All books, records, and documents concerning Internet 25gaming shall be available for inspection upon commercially 26reasonable notice by the Board during ordinary business hours   SB3723- 9 -LRB104 19758 LNS 33208 b1in accordance with the Board's rules and shall be maintained 2by each Internet gaming operator in a manner and during 3periods of time as the Board shall require.4    (h) Each Internet gaming operator shall maintain a file 5containing samples of the types and forms of advertising and 6promotional materials that it has used for Internet gaming in 7connection with this State for a period of 2 years. Such 8advertising samples shall be made available or produced for 9inspection upon the Board's request. The Board shall allow for 10Internet gaming operators to advertise beginning on the date 11of their licensing approval, including a temporary licensing 12approval. Nothing in this Section shall require Internet 13gaming operators to obtain advertising preapproval from the 14Board. 15    Section 30. Internet wagering accounts.16    (a) Eligible persons seeking to establish Internet 17wagering accounts may do so in person at a casino or racetrack 18or over the Internet without appearing in person. An Internet 19gaming operator shall adopt reasonable procedures to ensure 20that individuals have no more than one Internet wagering 21account with the Internet gaming operator. However, nothing in 22this Act prohibits the use of a single account for a sports 23wagering account under the Sports Wagering Act and the 24Internet wagering account set forth under this Act.25    (b) A participant may deposit and withdraw funds from the   SB3723- 10 -LRB104 19758 LNS 33208 b1participant's Internet wagering accounts in person at a casino 2or racetrack or over the Internet through electronic means to 3the extent allowed by federal law, including debit and credit 4cards; Automated Clearing House transfers; wire transfers; 5deposits and withdrawals of cash or gaming chips at cashiering 6locations in a river boat, a casino, or any property or 7facility owned, maintained, or leased by an organization 8licensee, an owners licensee, an Internet gaming operator, an 9Internet gaming licensee, or any other facility where a 10gambling game, a casino game, slot machines, table games, or 11other gambling operation occurs; deposits and withdrawals of 12cash at retail locations in the State approved by the Board; 13reloadable prepaid cards; gift cards; cash complimentary, 14promotional credits, or bonus credits; winnings; digital, 15crypto, and virtual currencies; or other means as approved by 16the Board.17    (c) An Internet gaming operator shall include, as part of 18the Internet gaming operator's internal controls, mechanisms 19and procedures for reasonably detecting unauthorized access to 20Internet wagering accounts, unauthorized attempts to access 21Internet wagering accounts, and suspicious Internet wagering 22activity constituting cheating, theft, embezzlement, 23collusion, money laundering, and other illegal activity.24    (d) As permitted by federal law, nothing in this Act 25prohibits Internet gaming operators from linking or otherwise 26commingling Internet wagering accounts with an eligible   SB3723- 11 -LRB104 19758 LNS 33208 b1person's Internet wagering account in another jurisdiction. 2However, each Internet gaming operator must retain records of 3all deposits, withdraws, wagers, and wager results that take 4place within this State and pursuant to this Act and ensure all 5taxes and fees due under this Act are properly documented and 6paid. 7    Section 35. License requirements.8    (a) No person may offer Internet games in this State 9unless all necessary licenses have been obtained in accordance 10with this Act and the rules of the Board. The Board may issue 11the following licenses to persons, firms, partnerships, or 12corporations that apply for licensure upon a determination by 13the Board that the applicant is eligible for the license under 14this Act and rules adopted by the Board:15        (1) Internet gaming license;16        (2) Internet management service provider license;17        (3) supplier license; and18        (4) occupational license.19    (b) The Board shall issue an Internet gaming license upon 20request to any owners licensee or organization licensee that 21meets the conditions of subsection (i). The fee for a license 22shall be $250,000. An Internet gaming license shall be valid 23for the same period of time as the requester's owners license 24or organization license and shall be renewed as a matter of 25course upon renewal of the owners license or organization   SB3723- 12 -LRB104 19758 LNS 33208 b1license and for the same period of time as the owners license 2or organization license. The fee for renewal of an Internet 3gaming license is $100,000. If an Internet gaming license is 4received after the issuance or renewal of an owners license or 5organizational license, the Internet gaming license fee shall 6be prorated for the remainder of the existing term.7    (c) An entity may apply for an Internet management service 8provider license in the form as may be required by the Board 9consistent with the requirements of this Act. The Board shall 10provide an abbreviated application for entities that hold or 11have a pending application for a management service provider 12license under the Sports Wagering Act or other types of gaming 13under Illinois law. Before issuance of an Internet management 14service provider license under this Act, the applicant shall 15pay to the Board a licensing fee of $100,000 or, for applicants 16holding a management service provider license issued under 17other State law, a licensing fee of $50,000. An Internet 18management service provider license issued under this Act 19shall be valid for 4 years, subject to renewal upon payment of 20a fee of $50,000.21    (d) An applicant for a supplier license shall apply in the 22form as may be required by the Board consistent with the 23requirements of this Act. The Board shall provide an 24abbreviated application for entities that hold or have a 25pending application for a supplier license under the Sports 26Wagering Act or other types of gaming under State law. Before   SB3723- 13 -LRB104 19758 LNS 33208 b1issuance of a supplier license under this Act, the applicant 2shall pay to the Board a licensing fee of $75,000 or, for 3applicants holding a supplier license issued under other 4Illinois law, a licensing fee of $50,000. A supplier license 5issued under this Act shall be valid for 4 years, subject to 6renewal upon payment of a fee of $50,000.7    (e) An applicant for an occupation license shall apply in 8the form as may be required by the Board consistent with the 9requirements of this Act for individuals who can directly 10change critical components of Internet game system hardware or 11software and meet 2 of the following requirements: 12        (1) have access to wagering account holders' 13    personally identifying information; 14        (2) have the ability to make adjustments to Internet 15    wagering accounts; or 16        (3) have direct interaction with wagering account 17    holders. 18    Before issuance of an occupational license under this Act, 19the applicant shall pay to the Board a licensing fee of $150 20or, for applicants holding an occupational license issued 21under other State law, a licensing fee of $100. An 22occupational license issued under this Act shall be valid for 234 years, subject to renewal upon payment of a fee of $100. An 24Internet gaming licensee may pay an occupational licensing fee 25on behalf of its employees.26    (f) The Board shall issue any license under this Act upon   SB3723- 14 -LRB104 19758 LNS 33208 b1payment of the license fee to an applicant that meets the 2conditions of subsection (i), if applicable, and a showing 3that the applicant holds an equivalent license under the 4Sports Wagering Act or, otherwise, has an equivalent license 5to conduct Internet gaming in another U.S. jurisdiction with 6licensing standards similar to those established under this 7Act and accompanying rules.8    (g) The Board shall issue any license under this Act on a 9temporary basis within 30 days after receiving an application 10to any applicant that holds an equivalent license or temporary 11license under the Sports Wagering Act or, otherwise, has 12equivalent licenses in connection with Internet gaming in 13another U.S. jurisdiction with licensing standards similar to 14those established under this Act and accompanying rules. The 15Board shall issue the temporary license under this subsection 16within 30 days after receiving a completed application unless 17it is aware of credible information that may prevent the 18issuance of a license or require certain conditions on a 19license to ensure compliance with State gaming law, subject to 20due process. The temporary license shall be valid for a period 21of one year. The Board may revoke a temporary license at any 22time if it becomes aware of credible information that may 23prevent the issuance of a license or require certain 24conditions on a license to ensure compliance with State gaming 25law. A temporary license shall otherwise be deemed to be the 26equivalent of a full license for all purposes. A temporary   SB3723- 15 -LRB104 19758 LNS 33208 b1license shall be renewed if a final determination has not been 2made by the Board on permanent licensure within one year. The 3Board shall adopt a process for ensuring an equal opportunity 4for all licensees to initially launch on a date set forth by 5the Board.6    (h) The Board may require background investigations for 7any officer, director, or shareholder with 10% or more equity 8interests of an applicant for an Internet management service 9provider license. The Board may recover the actual and 10reasonable costs of an investigation conducted under this 11subsection from any license applicant. The Board shall waive a 12background investigation upon a showing that a background 13investigation has previously been conducted on the applicant 14under the Sports Wagering Act. The Board may accept a 15background investigation conducted by another state with 16licensing standards similar to those established under this 17Act and accompanying rules.18    (i) The Board may not issue an Internet gaming license to 19an owners licensee or organization licensee that has reduced 20the size of its workforce by 25% or more since February 28, 212020. The Board may not renew the Internet gaming license of 22any owners licensee or organization licensee that has reduced 23the size of its workforce by 25% since the date its last 24Internet gaming license was issued or renewed. 25    Section 40. Age verification; location; responsible   SB3723- 16 -LRB104 19758 LNS 33208 b1gaming.2    (a) An Internet gaming platform's internal controls shall 3include one or more mechanisms to reasonably verify that a 4participant is 21 years of age or older, that wagering on 5Internet games is limited to transactions that are initiated 6and received within the State or a permissible jurisdiction, 7and that the participant is physically located within the 8State or a permissible jurisdiction.9    (b) The Board shall develop responsible Internet gaming 10measures, including a statewide responsible gaming database 11identifying individuals who shall be prohibited from 12establishing an Internet wagering account or participating in 13Internet gaming offered by an Internet gaming operator. The 14Board shall adopt rules for the establishment and maintenance 15of the responsible gaming database, which shall include 16allowances for individuals to self-exclude from Internet 17wagering, including making self-exclusion elections through an 18Internet gaming operator on an Internet gaming platform or in 19person at casinos or racetracks. The Board shall maintain the 20responsible gaming database in a confidential manner and 21Internet gaming operators shall not knowingly accept wagers 22from anyone listed on the responsible gaming database. 23Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, a self-exclusion 24election and the responsible gaming database are not public 25records subject to copying and disclosure under the Freedom of 26Information Act.  SB3723- 17 -LRB104 19758 LNS 33208 b1    (c) Each Internet gaming platform shall display the words 2"If you or someone you know has a gambling problem, help is 3available. Call (toll-free telephone number)" or some 4comparable language approved by the Board, which language 5shall include the words "gambling problem" and "call 6(toll-free telephone number)", to be displayed on the home 7page accessible to any person initially logging into the 8Internet gaming platform. Similar information shall be 9accessible to account holders when logged onto the Internet 10gaming platform.11    (d) Each Internet gaming platform shall include mechanisms 12for temporary and permanent self-exclusion through the Board's 13statewide responsible gaming database from Internet gaming. 14Each Internet gaming platform shall include mechanisms for 15termination of a patron's Internet wagering account. 16Additionally, each Internet gaming platform shall include 17player self-imposed wagering and deposit limits, including a 18deposit limit offered on a daily, weekly, and monthly basis 19that allows patrons to specify the maximum amount of money 20they can deposit into the Internet wagering account during the 21particular time period; and a spend limit offered on a daily, 22weekly, and monthly basis that allows patrons to specify the 23maximum amount of the deposits that they may put at risk during 24the particular time period. Self-imposed wagering or deposit 25limits shall take effect immediately but increases to a 26previously imposed limit shall not take effect until the   SB3723- 18 -LRB104 19758 LNS 33208 b1expiration of the limit per the terms of the patron's original 2election. A licensee under this Act shall not knowingly mail 3or otherwise forward any gaming-related promotional materials 4or electronic mail to a participant during any period in which 5the patron has elected to temporarily or permanently suspend 6oneself from all Internet gaming or permanently terminate 7Internet gaming through the account.8    (e) A patron shall continue to have the ability to 9withdraw funds, notwithstanding any temporary or permanent 10suspension or limits placed upon the account pursuant to this 11Section. 12    Section 45. Tax.13    (a) A privilege tax is imposed on an Internet gaming 14operator based on the adjusted gross gaming revenue wagered on 15Internet gaming platforms authorized under this Act at a rate 16of 25% of adjusted gross gaming revenue. This privilege tax is 17the exclusive tax in relation to Internet gaming. No local 18government of this State, including home rule municipalities, 19may impose or levy taxes on adjusted gross gaming revenue.20    (b) All moneys collected under this Act by the Board shall 21be deposited into the State Gaming Fund. The taxes imposed by 22this Section shall be paid by the Internet gaming operator no 23later than the last day of the month following the calendar 24month in which the adjusted gross gaming receipts were 25received and the tax obligation was accrued.  SB3723- 19 -LRB104 19758 LNS 33208 b1    (c) If the taxpayer's adjusted gross gaming revenue for a 2month is a negative number, the taxpayer may carry over the 3negative amount to a return filed a subsequent month and 4deduct such amount from its tax liability for such month, 5provided that such amount shall not be carried over and 6deducted against tax liability in any month that is more than 712 months later than the month in which such amount was 8accrued.9    (d) Of the total revenue deposited into the State Gaming 10Fund under this Act, 95% of that tax revenue shall be 11distributed according to Section 13 of the Illinois Gambling 12Act, wherein the Internet gaming operator shall be treated as 13the owners licensee or organization licensee that holds the 14Internet gaming license under this Act. The remaining 5% of 15that tax revenue shall be distributed to municipalities and 16counties in the manner provided under Section 2 of the State 17Revenue Sharing Act and used for the purposes specified in 18Section 3 of the State Revenue Sharing Act. Distribution to 19municipalities and counties shall be made in proportion to 20each municipality's and county's population to the State. 21    Section 50. Diversity programs.22    (a) As used in this Section only, "licensee" means an 23Internet gaming licensee under this Act.24    (b) The public policy of this State is to collaboratively 25work with companies that serve State residents to improve   SB3723- 20 -LRB104 19758 LNS 33208 b1their supplier diversity in a non-antagonistic manner.2    (c) The Board shall require all licensees under this Act 3to submit an annual report by April 15, 2027 and every April 15 4thereafter, in a searchable Adobe PDF format, on all 5procurement goals and actual spending for businesses owned by 6women, minorities, veterans, and persons with disabilities and 7small business enterprises in the previous calendar year. 8These goals shall be expressed as a percentage of the total 9work performed by the entity submitting the report, and the 10actual spending for all businesses owned by women, minorities, 11veterans, and persons with disabilities and small business 12enterprises shall also be expressed as a percentage of the 13total work performed by the entity submitting the report.14    (d) Each licensee in its annual report shall include the 15following information: 16        (1) an explanation of the plan for the next year to 17    increase participation; 18        (2) an explanation of the plan to increase the goals; 19        (3) the areas of procurement each licensee shall be 20    actively seeking more participation in the next year;21        (4) an outline of the plan to alert and encourage 22    potential vendors in that area to seek business from the 23    licensee;24        (5) an explanation of the challenges faced in finding 25    quality vendors and offer any suggestions for what the 26    Board could do to be helpful to identify those vendors;  SB3723- 21 -LRB104 19758 LNS 33208 b1        (6) a list of the certifications the licensee 2    recognizes; 3        (7) the point of contact for any potential vendor who 4    wishes to do business with the licensee and explain the 5    process for a vendor to enroll with the licensee as a 6    businesses owned by women, minorities, veterans, or 7    persons with disabilities; and 8        (8) any particular success stories to encourage other 9    licensees to emulate best practices.10    (e) Each annual report shall include as much 11State-specific data as possible. If the submitting entity does 12not submit State-specific data, then the licensee shall 13include any national data it does have and explain why it could 14not submit State-specific data and how it intends to do so in 15future reports, if possible.16    (f) Each annual report shall include the rules, 17regulations, and definitions used for the procurement goals in 18the licensee's annual report.19    (g) The Board and all licensees shall hold an annual 20workshop and job fair open to the public in 2027 and every year 21thereafter on the state of supplier diversity to 22collaboratively seek solutions to structural impediments to 23achieving stated goals, including testimony from each licensee 24as well as subject matter experts and advocates. The Board 25shall publish a database on its website of the point of contact 26for licensees it regulates under this Act for supplier   SB3723- 22 -LRB104 19758 LNS 33208 b1diversity, along with a list of certifications each licensee 2recognizes from the information submitted in each annual 3report. The Board shall publish each annual report on its 4website and shall maintain each annual report for at least 5 5years.6    (h) A licensee under this Act that is also subject to the 7diversity program requirements of Section 7.6 of the Illinois 8Gambling Act shall include its Internet gaming activities 9within the supplier diversity goals and accompanying reports. 10Compliance with Section 7.6 of the Illinois Gambling Act shall 11be in lieu of compliance with the reporting requirements under 12this Act. 13    Section 55. Applicability of the Illinois Gambling Act and 14the Uniform Penalty and Interest Act. The provisions of the 15Illinois Gambling Act, and all rules adopted under that Act, 16shall apply to this Act, except where there is a conflict 17between those Acts, including the incompatibility of any 18provision to the conduct of gaming remotely, without a 19brick-and-mortar facility, or over the Internet. All 20provisions of the Uniform Penalty and Interest Act shall 21apply, as far as practicable, to the subject matter of this Act 22to the same extent as if such provisions were included in this 23Act. 24    Section 60. Acceptance of out-of-state wagers.   SB3723- 23 -LRB104 19758 LNS 33208 b1Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, 2wagers may be accepted under this Act from persons who are not 3physically present in this State if the Board has determined 4that out-of-state wagering is not inconsistent with federal 5law or the law of the jurisdiction in which the person is 6located or if out-of-state wagering is conducted pursuant to a 7reciprocal agreement to which this State is a party that is not 8inconsistent with federal law. The Board may enter into 9agreements with other jurisdictions to facilitate, administer, 10and regulate multijurisdictional approved Internet games, 11including, but not limited to, poker. 12    Section 65. Home rule. The licensure and conduct of 13Internet gaming conducted by a person or entity pursuant to 14this Act are exclusive powers and functions of the State. A 15home rule unit may not regulate or license Internet gaming. 16This Section is a denial and limitation of home rule powers and 17functions under subsection (h) of Section 6 of Article VII of 18the Illinois Constitution. 19    Section 95. The Illinois Administrative Procedure Act is 20amended by adding Section 5-45.71 as follows: 21    (5 ILCS 100/5-45.71 new)22    Sec. 5-45.71. Emergency rulemaking; Internet Gaming Act. 23To provide for the expeditious and timely implementation of   SB3723- 24 -LRB104 19758 LNS 33208 b1the Internet Gaming Act, emergency rules implementing the 2Internet Gaming Act shall be adopted in accordance with 3Section 5-45 by the Illinois Gaming Board. The adoption of 4emergency rules authorized by Section 5-45 and this Section is 5deemed to be necessary for the public interest, safety, and 6welfare.7    This Section is repealed on January 1, 2030.  8    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 9becoming law.